Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 2

Vocational Services to the Blind — General Provisions

71-4-201. Policy of state.

It is the policy of the state to encourage and enable persons who are blind or visually impaired to participate fully in the social and economic life of this state and to engage in remunerative employment.

Acts 1972, ch. 480, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 14-638, 14-14-101; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 97.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

71-4-202. Employment by public agencies.

It is the further policy of this state that totally blind or partially blind persons and persons otherwise disabled shall be employed in the state service, the service of the political subdivisions of the state, in the public schools and in all other employment supported in whole or part by public funds on the same terms and conditions as the able-bodied, unless it is shown that the particular disability prevents the performance of the work involved in such employment.

Acts 1972, ch. 480, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-639, 14-14-102.

71-4-203. Division of services for the blind created.

The department of human services shall create a division of services for the blind to develop measures for the prevention of blindness, the restoration of sight, and the vocational adjustment of blind persons, including employment in regular industries, independent business, workshops for the blind, or home industries, rehabilitation training and the instruction of adult blind in their homes; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with vending stands already located in state buildings and operated by blind persons.

All state service regulations now in force and effect in other divisions of the department shall apply in carrying out this section; provided, that this subsection (b) does not apply to employees in the workshops for the blind paid on a piecework or hourly basis.

Acts 1953, ch. 13, §§ 1, 2 (Williams, §§ 4765.3b, 4765.3c); modified; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-601, 14-14-103; Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Cross-References. State service, title 8, ch. 30.

71-4-204. Purchases made by the state, governing subdivisions of the state, or public institutions.

All purchases made by any agency of the state, whether or not through the purchasing division of the department of general services, or by any county, municipality, or other governing subdivision of the state, or by any public institution, shall be made from an agency of the state or a nonprofit workshop for the blind in Tennessee, operating under the approval of the department of human services and the division of services for the blind. This requirement shall not apply if these products are not available within the time period provided in §71-4-205, or in any case where products or services are available for procurement from any agency of this state and procurement from any agency of this state is required under any provisions of any law in effect on July 1, 1977.

Acts 1973, ch. 316, § 1; modified; 1977, ch. 283, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-646, 14-14-104.

71-4-205. Blind-made products — Conformity to standards — Prices.

Materials purchased from approved or state-operated workshops for the blind in Tennessee must conform to applicable federal standards and specifications for such products and be priced in accordance with prices provided by such standards. Workshops are to be given sixty (60) days from the date of receipt of the order to fill and deliver the order, in order to allow for procurement of materials and manufacture of the goods.

Acts 1973, ch. 316, § 1; modified; 1977, ch. 283, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 14-647, 14-14-105.